Illinois, session 104th, SB3603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Data processing. 8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Controller" means the natural or legal person who, alone 10or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of 11the processing of personal data.12    "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably be 13used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an 14identified or identifiable individual, or a device linked to 15such an individual.16    "Identified or identifiable individual" means a natural 17person who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly, 18based on personal data.19    "Personal data" means any information that is linked or 20reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable 21individual. "Personal data" does not include deidentified data 22or publicly available information.23    "Process" means any operation or set of operations   SB3603- 2 -LRB104 19802 SPS 33252 b1performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal 2data or on sets of personal data, including, but not limited 3to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis, 4deletion, or modification of personal data.5    "Processor" means a natural or legal person who processes 6personal data on behalf of a controller.7    "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to 8a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on 9personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer's 10activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or 11online applications to predict the consumer's preferences or 12interests. "Targeted advertising" does not include:13        (1) advertising based on activities within a 14    controller's own websites or online applications;15        (2) advertising based on the context of a consumer's 16    current search query or visit to a website or online 17    application;18        (3) advertising directed to a consumer in response to 19    the consumer's request for information or feedback; or20        (4) processing personal data solely for measuring or 21    reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency.22    (b) A consumer may opt out of the processing of personal 23data for the purpose of targeted advertising by submitting a 24request using the methods specified in the controller's 25privacy notice. A consumer may submit a request to a 26controller under this subsection at any time.  SB3603- 3 -LRB104 19802 SPS 33252 b1    (c) A controller that processes personal data for purposes 2of targeted advertising shall provide a clear and conspicuous 3method for a consumer to opt out of the processing of personal 4data for the purpose of targeted advertising. A controller 5shall establish one or more secure and reliable means for 6consumers to submit a request to opt out of the processing of 7personal data for the purpose of targeted advertising, taking 8into account the ways in which consumers normally interact 9with the controller, the need for secure and reliable 10communication of the requests, and the ability of the 11controller to verify the identity of the consumer making the 12request.13    (d) A consumer may authorize another person, acting on the 14consumer's behalf, to opt out of the processing of the 15consumer's personal data for purposes of targeted advertising. 16A consumer may designate an authorized agent through a 17technology, including, but not limited to, an Internet link or 18a browser setting, browser extension, or global device 19setting, indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the 20processing.21    A controller shall comply with an opt-out request received 22from a person authorized by the consumer to act on the 23consumer's behalf if the controller is able to authenticate, 24with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the 25consumer and the authorized agent's authority to act on the 26consumer's behalf.  SB3603- 4 -LRB104 19802 SPS 33252 b1    (e) If a controller is processing personal data for 2purposes of targeted advertising of a known child, the parent 3or legal guardian may opt the child out of the processing of 4personal data for the purpose of targeted advertising. If a 5controller is processing the personal data for purposes of 6targeted advertising of a consumer subject to a guardianship, 7conservatorship, or other protective arrangement, the guardian 8or the conservator of the consumer may opt the consumer out of 9the processing of personal data for the purpose of targeted 10advertising.11    (f) A controller shall allow consumers to exercise the 12right to opt out of the processing of personal data for 13purposes of targeted advertising through a user-selected, 14universal opt-out mechanism, including by an opt-out 15preference signal sent, with the consumer's consent, by a 16platform, technology, or mechanism to the controller 17indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing.18    (g) If a controller processes personal data for purposes 19of targeted advertising or sells personal data to third 20parties for targeted advertising, the controller shall 21disclose the processing or sale in a privacy notice and 22provide access to a clear and conspicuous method outside the 23privacy notice for a consumer to opt out of the sale or 24processing. This method may include, but is not limited to, an 25Internet hyperlink clearly labeled "Your Opt-Out Rights" or 26"Your Privacy Rights" that directly effectuates the opt-out   SB3603- 5 -LRB104 19802 SPS 33252 b1request or takes consumers to a web page where the consumer can 2make the opt-out request.3    The privacy notice shall be posted online through a 4conspicuous hyperlink using the word "privacy" on the 5controller's website home page or on a mobile application's 6store page or download page. A controller that maintains an 7application on a mobile or other device shall also include a 8hyperlink to the privacy notice in the application's settings 9menu or in a similarly conspicuous and accessible location. A 10controller that does not operate a website shall make the 11privacy notice conspicuously available to consumers through a 12medium regularly used by the controller to interact with 13consumers.14    (h) This Section applies to legal entities that conduct 15business in this State or produce products or services that 16are targeted to residents of this State, and that:17        (1) during a calendar year, control or process 18    personal data of 100,000 consumers or more, excluding 19    personal data controlled or processed solely for the 20    purpose of completing a payment transaction; or21        (2) derive over 25% of gross revenue from the sale of 22    personal data and process or control personal data of 23    25,000 consumers or more.24    (i) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 25practice within the meaning of this Act.  26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   SB3603- 6 -LRB104 19802 SPS 33252 b11, 2028.